ani_personal_pronouns.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# PERSONAL PRONOUNS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

PronounsAbs
PronounsErg
PronounsObl [<PRON>:] [>:>] Inflection


LEXICON PronounsAbs

ден<PRON>:ден                                                # я; I
мен<PRON>:мен                                                # ты; you (sg)
илIил<PRON>:илIил                                            # мы (incl); we (incl)
ищил<PRON>:ищил                                              # мы (excl); we (excl)
биссил<PRON>:биссил                                          # вы; you (pl)


LEXICON PronounsErg

ден<PRON>><erg>:ден>ни                                       # я; I
мен<PRON>><erg>:мен>ни                                       # ты; you (sg)
илIил<PRON>><erg>:илIи>ди                                    # мы (incl); we (incl)
ищил<PRON>><erg>:ищи>ди                                      # мы (excl); we (excl)
биссил<PRON>><erg>:бисси>ди                                  # вы; you (pl)


LEXICON PronounsObl

ден:ди                                                       # я; I
мен:ду                                                       # ты; you (sg)
илIил:илIи                                                   # мы (incl); we (incl)
ищил:ищи                                                     # мы (excl); we (excl)
биссил:бисси                                                 # вы; you (pl)


LEXICON Inflection

<dat>:й
<dat>:лъу
<gen>:лIи
<gen><m>:в
<gen><f>:й
<gen><an><sg>:б
<gen><an><pl>:й
<gen><inan1>:б
<gen><inan2>:р
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул
<aff><m>:во
<aff><f>:йо
<aff><an><sg>:бо
<aff><an><pl>:йо
<aff><inan1>:бо
<aff><inan2>:ро
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
